Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 5. Finance.

§79-29-501.
Form of contribution.

The contribution of a member may be in cash, property, services rendered, or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-501 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to forms of contributions of members. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

Assignor of a limited liability company interest not released from liability to the company under this article, see § 79-29-707.

§79-29-502.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-502. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-502 was entitled: Liability for contributions. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-503.

§79-29-503.
Liability for contributions.

A promise by a member to contribute to the limited liability company is not enforceable unless set out in a writing signed by the member.

A member is obligated to the limited liability company to perform an enforceable promise to contribute cash or property or to perform services, even if the member is unable to perform because of death, disability or any other reason.If a member does not make the required contribution of property or services, the member is obligated at the option of the limited liability company to contribute cash equal to that portion of the value of the stated contribution that has not been made.The foregoing option shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other rights, including the right to specific performance, that the limited liability company may have against the member under the operating agreement or applicable law.

The obligation of a member to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation of this chapter may be compromised only by specific consent of all the members.However, a creditor of a limited liability company who extends credit, or otherwise acts in reliance on that obligation after the member signs a writing that reflects the obligation and before the amendment or cancellation thereof to reflect the compromise, may enforce the original obligation to the same extent as the limited liability company could pursuant to this section.A conditional obligation of a member to make a contribution or return money or other property to a limited liability company may not be enforced unless the conditions of the obligation have been satisfied or waived as to or by such member.Conditional obligations include contributions payable upon a discretionary call of a limited liability company prior to the time the call occurs.

A certificate of formation or operating agreement may provide that the interest of any member who fails to make any contribution that the member is obligated to make, shall be subject to specified penalties for, or specified consequences of, such failure.Such penalty or consequence may take the form of reducing the defaulting member’s proportionate financial or governance interest in the limited liability company, subordinating the defaulting member’s financial or governance interests to that of nondefaulting members, forcing a sale of the defaulting member’s financial or governance interest, forfeiting the defaulting member’s financial or governance interest, the lending by other members of the amount necessary to meet the defaulting member’s commitment, fixing the value of the defaulting member’s financial or governance interest by appraisal or by formula and redeeming or selling of the defaulting member’s financial or governance interest at such value, or other penalty or consequence.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-503 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to sharing of profits and looses. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-505.

§79-29-504.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-504. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-504 was entitled: Sharing of distributions. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-507.

§79-29-505.
Sharing of profits and losses.

The profits and losses of a limited liability company shall be allocated among the members who own financial interests and other owners of financial interests, and among groups or classes of members, in the manner provided in the certificate of formation or operating agreement.Profits and losses must be allocated on the basis of the agreed value, as stated in the limited liability company records required to be kept pursuant to Section 79-29-115, of the contributions made by each owner of a financial interest to the extent they have been received by the limited liability company and have not been returned.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-507.
Sharing of distributions.

Distributions of cash or other assets of a limited liability company must be allocated among the members who own financial interests and other owners of financial interests, and among classes or groups of members, in the manner provided in the certificate of formation or operating agreement. Distributions must be made on the basis of the agreed value, as stated in the limited liability company records required to be kept pursuant to Section 79-29-115, of the contributions made by each member who owns a financial interest to the extent they have been received by the limited liability company and have not been returned.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-509.
Defense of usury not available.

No obligation of a member, manager or officer of a limited liability company to the limited liability company arising under the operating agreement or a separate agreement or writing, and no note, instrument or other writing evidencing any such obligation of a member, manager or officer, shall be subject to the defense of usury, and no member, manager or officer shall interpose the defense of usury with respect to any such obligation in any action.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.